Virginia statutes. Title 28.2. Fisheries and Habitat of the Tidal Waters
Chapter 1. Administration

Transition provisions.

Senate Joint Resolution 17 of the 1990 General Assembly directed the Virginia Code Commission to undertake a revision of Title 28.1. In January of 1992, the Commission sent to the Governor and General Assembly its report containing the proposed revision of Title 28.1 which was published as Senate Document No. 21 of the 1992 Session. The Commission’s draft of the revision of Title 28.1, as amended by the General Assembly, became c. 836 of the Acts of 1992 and was effective Oct. 1, 1992.

Many of the cases cited in the notes under the various sections of this title were decided under corresponding provisions of Title 28.1 or prior law.

Acts 1992, c. 836, cl. 2, provides that whenever any of the conditions, requirements, provisions or contents of any section or chapter of Title 28.1 or any other title of this Code as such titles existed prior to Oct. 1, 1992, are transferred in the same or modified form to a new section or chapter of this title or any other title of this Code and whenever any such former section or chapter is given a new number in this or any other title, all references to any such former section or chapter of Title 28.1 or any other title appearing in this Code shall be construed to apply to the new or renumbered section or chapter containing such conditions, requirements, provisions, contents or portions thereof.

Acts 1992, c. 836, cl. 3, provides that the rules and regulations of the Industrial Commission of Virginia in effect on the effective date of this act (Oct. 1, 1992) shall continue in effect to the extent that they are not in conflict with this act and shall be deemed to be regulations promulgated under this act.

Acts 1992, c. 836, cl. 4, provides that this recodification of Title 28.1 as Title 28.2 shall not be construed to require the reappointment of any officer or any member of a board, council, committee or other appointed body referred to in Title 28.2, and each such officer and member shall continue to serve the term for which appointed pursuant to the provisions of Title 28.1.